dev/segmenter/apertium-evn.evn-seg.twol
"Yotised vowel harmony for {Я}: я is chosen"
%{Я%}:я <=>   :VowA %{ː%}: [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]*  _ %{ː%}: ;
              :VowO %{ː%}: [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]*  _ ;
                                                      :VowO ?* [ :Vow - :VowO ] ?* _ ;
                                                                  .#. :э %{ː%}: ?* _ ;
                                                           .#. :Cons+ :е %{ː%}: ?* _ ;
                                                                        %{а%}: ?*  _ ;
                     :VowA [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]* _ ;

          except
                                                                         %{э%}: ?* _ ;
                                          [ %>: %{i%}: л | н | %>: р ] %>: %{ъ%}:0 _ ;
                                                             [ %{D%}:ч | %{D%}:т ] _ ;
                                              :VowO [ :Cons | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]* _ ;

"Yotised vowel harmony for {Я}: е is chosen"
%{Я%}:е <=>  [ :VowE | :VowA ] %{ː%}: [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]*  _ ;
                                 :VowE [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]* _ ;
                                                                                    %{э%}: ?*  _ ;
         except
                          :VowA %{ː%}: [ :Cons | :VowNeutral ( %{ː%}: ) | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]*  _ %{ː%}: ;
                                                      [ %>: %{i%}: л | н | %>: р ] %>: %{ъ%}:0 _ ;
                                                                         [ %{D%}:ч | %{D%}:т ] _ ;
                                                                              .#. :э %{ː%}: ?* _ ;
                                                                       .#. :Cons+ :е %{ː%}: ?* _ ;
                                                                         [ :VowO | %{а%}: ] ?* _ ;


"Yotised vowel harmony for {Я}: ё is chosen"
%{Я%}:ё <=> :VowO [ :Cons | [ :0 | %>: ] | :ь | :ъ | %- ]* _ ;
    except 
!             [ :о | :ё ] ?* [ :Vow - :VowO ] ?*  _ ;
                         [ %{а%}: | %{э%}: ] ?*  _ ;
        [ %>: %{i%}: л | н | %>: р ] %>: %{ъ%}:0 _ ;
                           [ %{D%}:ч | %{D%}:т ] _ ;

"ъ appears after Cons"
%{ъ%}:ъ <=>                   :Cons [ :0 | %>: ]* %>: _ ;
              except
           [ %>: %{i%}: л | н | %>: р ] %>: _ ;

!# уму{а}к>{ъ}{Я}
!# уму0к0ъя
!@ у м у {а}:0 к >:0 {ъ}:ъ {Я}:я

!# дэт>{ъ}{Я}	
!# дэт0ъе
!@ д э т >:0 {ъ}:ъ {Я}:е


!cat apertium-evn.evn.twol | grep '^!@' | cut -f2 -d'@' | hfst-pair-test .deps/evn.twol.hfst
